Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1143.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-7 of the General Laws entitled "Collection of Taxes Generally"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-7-10.4. East Greenwich. -- Non-issuance and/or renewal of licenses or permits to
applicants or licensees in arrears in local taxes, liens, and assessments in town.
(a) No license or permit issued by the town of East Greenwich, and required for the
operation of a business, shall be issued or renewed to any person or applicant who is in arrears for
the payment of any local taxes, liens or other assessments applicable to the operation of the
business, unless the matter has been duly appealed in a timely fashion to a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(b) No demolition or building permit may be issued for new construction and/or the
renovation or alteration of an existing structure if the party assessed or property owner is in arrears
for the payment of any real property tax, lien, or other town assessment on real property. This
prohibition applies only to the real property that is the subject of the building permit application.
This section does not apply to construction that serves to abate a pending notice of violation issued
by the town of East Greenwich or any of its officials and/or representatives.
(c) Any applicant seeking any license or permit or any renewal of any license or permit
must submit verification from the property tax or assessment collection agency of the town that all
town taxes, liens, and assessments are paid to date.
(d) The licensing or permitting authority has the discretion to issue a license or permit,

notwithstanding the forgoing, if the applicant has entered an approved repayment plan for the tax
arrearage and is current on making payments pursuant to that plan.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003042
========
LC003042 - Page 2 of 3